Vermont, session 2025-2026, H169.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 4456a is amended to read:
§ 4456a. RESIDENTIAL RENTAL APPLICATION FEES; PROHIBITED
ACTS
(a) A landlord or a landlord’s agent shall not:
(1) charge an application fee to any individual in order to apply to enter
into a rental agreement for a residential dwelling unit; or
(2) request the Social Security number of an individual or a member of
an individual’s household in order to apply to enter into a rental agreement for
a residential dwelling unit or to conduct a criminal background or credit check.
VT LEG #379534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.169
2025 Page 3 of 8
(b) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a person from charging a
fee to a person in order to apply to rent commercial or nonresidential property.
(c) If required during the application process, a landlord or a landlord’s
agent shall accept an original or a copy of any form of government-issued
identification.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. § 4501 is amended to read:
§ 4501. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(12)(A) “Harass” means to engage in unwelcome conduct that detracts
from, undermines, or interferes with a person’s:
(i) use of a place of public accommodation or any of the
accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of a place of public
accommodation because of the person’s race, creed, color, national origin,
citizenship, immigration status, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, or disability; or
(ii) terms, conditions, privileges, or protections in the sale or rental
of a dwelling or other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in
connection with a dwelling or other real estate, because of the person’s race,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed,
color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, or disability, or because
VT LEG #379534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.169
2025 Page 4 of 8
the person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or
because the person is a recipient of public assistance, or because the person is a
victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
* * *
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONS
(a) An owner or operator of a place of public accommodation or an agent
or employee of such owner or operator shall not, because of the race, creed,
color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, marital status, sex,
sexual orientation, or gender identity of any person, refuse, withhold from, or
deny to that person any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, and
privileges of the place of public accommodation.
* * *
Sec. 4. 9 V.S.A. § 4503 is amended to read:
§ 4503. UNFAIR HOUSING PRACTICES
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent, or refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental
of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling or other real estate to
any person because of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a
VT LEG #379534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.169
2025 Page 5 of 8
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
(2) To discriminate against, or to harass, any person in the terms,
conditions, privileges, and protections of the sale or rental of a dwelling or
other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with
a dwelling or other real estate, because of the race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
citizenship, immigration status, or disability of a person, or because a person
intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a
person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of
abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published
any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a
dwelling or other real estate that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
VT LEG #379534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.169
2025 Page 6 of 8
(4) To represent to any person because of the race, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national
origin, citizenship, immigration status, or disability of a person, or because a
person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or
because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a
victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, that any dwelling or other real
estate is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when the dwelling or real
estate is in fact so available.
* * *
(6) To discriminate against any person in the making or purchasing of
loans or providing other financial assistance for real-estate-related transactions
or in the selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property, because
of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status,
religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, or
disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with
one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public
assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(7) To engage in blockbusting practices, for profit, which may include
inducing or attempting to induce a person to sell or rent a dwelling by
representations regarding the entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons of a particular race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
VT LEG #379534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.169
2025 Page 7 of 8
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
(8) To deny any person access to or membership or participation in any
multiple listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service,
organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings,
or to discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such access,
membership, or participation, on account of race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
citizenship, immigration status, or disability of a person, or because a person is
a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking.
* * *
(12) To discriminate in land use decisions or in the permitting of
housing because of race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital
status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status,
disability, the presence of one or more minor children, income, or because of
the receipt of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking, except as otherwise provided by law.
VT LEG #379534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.169
2025 Page 8 of 8
* * *
(d) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section with respect to
discrimination in the sales and rentals of dwellings on the basis of citizenship
or immigration status shall not preclude the verification of immigration status
if required by federal law.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379534 v.1